Utah statutes.
7-1-611.   Deposit accounts of minors or married persons.

(1)  A depository institution may issue a deposit account to a married person or minor as the sole and absolute owner of the deposit account, and receive payment on the account by or for the owner, and pay withdrawals, accept pledges to the institution, and act in any other manner with respect to the account on the order of the married person or minor.

(2)  A payment or delivery of rights to a married person or minor, or a receipt or acquisition signed by a married person or minor who holds a deposit account, shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the institution for any payment so made or delivery of rights to the married person or minor.

(3)  In the case of a minor, the receipt, acquittance, pledge, or other action required by the institution to be taken by the minor shall be binding upon the minor with like effect as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity.

(4)  The parent or guardian of the minor may not in the capacity as parent or guardian have the power to attach or in any manner to transfer any deposit account issued to or in the name of the minor. However, in the event of the death of the minor, the receipt or acquittance of either parent or of a person standing in loco parentis to the minor shall be a valid and sufficient discharge of the institution for any sum or sums not exceeding in the aggregate $2,500, unless the minor gave written notice to the institution not to accept the signature of the parent or person.



Amended by Chapter 182, 1996 General Session

